Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 87.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-187
Certificate of registration; expiration;
annual application.

Each
certificate of registration issued to a limited liability company pursuant
to section 21-186 shall expire by its own terms one year from the date of
issuance and may not be renewed. Each limited liability company shall annually
apply (1) to its regulatory body for a certificate in the manner provided
in subsection (1) of section 21-186 or (2) to the Secretary of State pursuant
to subsection (2) of section 21-186 if the records of the regulatory body
are electronically accessible to the Secretary of State. A certificate or
application shall be delivered annually to the Secretary of State for filing
within thirty days before the expiration date of the last certificate or application
on file in the office of the Secretary of State or the limited liability company
shall be suspended. Certificates shall not be transferable or assignable.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 87.